src/morphology/guesser.lexc
LEXICON GuessName

  < [Name & NimiARMEE] > GuessNameARMEE ;
  < [Name & NimiAASTA] > GuessNameAASTA ;
  < [Name & NimioPERE] > GuessNamePERE ;
  < [Name & NimiOLULINE] > GuessNameOLULINE ;
  < [Name & NimiSOOLANE] > GuessNameSOOLANE ;
  < [Name & NimiOLULIS] > GuessNameOLULIS ;
  < [Name & NimiSOOLAS] > GuessNameSOOLAS ;
  < [Name & NimiMUUSEUM] > GuessNameMUUSEUM ;
  < [Name & NimiELANIK] > GuessNameELANIK ;
  < [Name & NimiVIRSIK] > GuessNameVIRSIK ;
  < [Name & NimiKABINET] > GuessNameKABINET ;
  < [Name & NimiMAGUS] > GuessNameMAGUS ;
  < [Name & NimiREDEL] > GuessNameREDEL ;
  < [Name & NimiTAUD] > GuessNameTAUD ;
  < [Name & ProtoKOND] d:"D1"> GuessNameKOND ; ! ?? kas on ikka vaja?

LEXICON GuessSimplexNoun

  < [Word & ProtoARMEE] > GuessARMEE ;
  < [Word & ProtoKAVA] > GuessKAVA ;
  < [Word & ProtoAASTA] > GuessAASTA ;
  < [Word & ProtoPERE]  > GuessPERE ;
  < [Word & ProtoPEENIKE] > GuessPEENIKE ;
  < [Word & ProtoOLULINE & ~[[?* DerLane] | [?* DerMine]]] > GuessOLULINE ; ! adjectives
  < [Word & ProtoOLULINE &  [[?* DerLane] | [?* DerMine]]] > GuessOLULIS ;  ! nouns
  < [Word & ProtoSOOLANE] > GuessSOOLANE ;
  < [Word & ProtoSOOLANE &  [?* DerLane]] > GuessMAALANE ;
  < [Word & ProtoOLULIS] > GuessOLULIS ;
  < [Word & ProtoSOOLAS] > GuessSOOLAS ;
  < [Word & ProtoMUUSEUM] > GuessMUUSEUM ;
  < [Word & ProtoELANIK] > GuessELANIK ;
  < [Word & ProtoELANIK & [?* lL iI kK]] > GuessLIK ;
  < [Word & ProtoVIRSIK] > GuessVIRSIK ;
  < [Word & ProtoKABINET] > GuessKABINET ;
  < [Word & ProtoMAGUS] > GuessMAGUS ;
  < [Word & ProtoLOHAKAS] > GuessLOHAKAS ;
  < [Word & ProtoREDEL] > GuessREDEL ;
  < [Word & ProtoTAUD] > GuessTAUD ;
  < [Word & ProtoKOND] d:"D1"> GuessKOND ;

! these  

LEXICON GuessDerivation
!  < Letter* Vowel Consonant+ Vowel > GuessLine ; 
!  < [Word & [?* Consonant]] Vowel > GuessLine ;
!  < [Word & [?* Consonant]] > GuessLane ; 
!  < [Word & [?* Consonant]] Vowel > GuessMine ; 
!  < [Word & [?* Vowel [Vowel | Consonant] Consonant+]] > GuessNe ; ! raudne akuutne
  < Consonant* Vowel+ Consonant+ Vowel [[Consonant+ Vowel] - [[l i] | [l a] | [m i] | [k e]]] n e > GuessOluline ; ! edasine, ??
  < Consonant* Vowel+ Consonant+ Vowel > GuessNe ; ! soolane
  < [ [? ? ?+ Vowel [Vowel | Consonant] Consonant+]] > GuessNe ; ! raudne akuutne
  < [ [? ? ?+ Consonant]] Vowel > GuessLine ;
  < [ [? ? ?+ Consonant]] > GuessLane ; 
  < [ [? ? ?+ Consonant]] Vowel > GuessMine ; 

LEXICON GuessLane   
    +Guess: LANE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessLine   
    +Guess: LINE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessMine   
    +Guess: MINE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessNe   
    +Guess: NE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

!LEXICON GuessUs   
!    +Guess: US_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessOluline
    +Guess+A: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessOlulane   
    +Guess+N: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessARMEE
   +Guess+N: ARMEE ;

LEXICON GuessNameARMEE
   +Guess+N+Prop: ARMEE ;

LEXICON GuessKAVA
   +Guess+N: KAVA ;

LEXICON GuessNameKAVA
   +Guess+N+Prop: KAVA ;

LEXICON GuessAASTA
   +Guess+N: AASTA ;

LEXICON GuessNameAASTA
   +Guess+N+Prop: AASTA ;

LEXICON GuessPERE
   +Guess+N: PERE ;

LEXICON GuessNamePERE
   +Guess+N+Prop: PERE ;

LEXICON GuessPEENIKE
   +Guess+N: PEENIKE ;
   +Guess+A: PEENIKE ;

LEXICON GuessOLULINE
   +Guess+A: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessNameOLULINE
   +Guess+N+Prop: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessSOOLANE
   +Guess+A: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessMAALANE
   +Guess+N: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessNameSOOLANE
   +Guess+N+Prop: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessOLULIS
   +Guess+N: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessNameOLULIS
   +Guess+N+Prop: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessSOOLAS
   +Guess+N: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessNameSOOLAS
   +Guess+N+Prop: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessMUUSEUM
   +Guess+N: MUUSEUM ;

LEXICON GuessNameMUUSEUM
   +Guess+N+Prop: MUUSEUM ;

LEXICON GuessELANIK
   +Guess+N: ELANIK ;

LEXICON GuessLIK
   +Guess+A: ELANIK ;

LEXICON GuessNameELANIK
   +Guess+N+Prop: ELANIK ;

LEXICON GuessVIRSIK
   +Guess+N: VIRSIK ;

LEXICON GuessNameVIRSIK
   +Guess+N+Prop: VIRSIK ;

LEXICON GuessKABINET
   +Guess+N: KABINET ;

LEXICON GuessNameKABINET
   +Guess+N+Prop: KABINET ;
   +Guess+N+Prop: FIAT ;   ! ?? no change in orthography

LEXICON GuessMAGUS
   +Guess+N: MAGUS ;

LEXICON GuessNameMAGUS
   +Guess+N+Prop: MAGUS ;

LEXICON GuessLOHAKAS
   +Guess+A: LOHAKAS ;

LEXICON GuessREDEL
   +Guess+N: REDEL ;

LEXICON GuessNameREDEL
   +Guess+N+Prop: REDEL ;

LEXICON GuessTAUD
   +Guess+N: TAUD ;

LEXICON GuessNameTAUD
   +Guess+N+Prop: TAUD ;
   +Guess+N+Prop: FIAT ;   ! ?? no change in orthography

LEXICON GuessKOND
   +Guess+N:%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;

LEXICON GuessNameKOND
   +Guess+N+Prop:%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
